Delaware, session 153, SB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§7702, Title 10 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 7702. Commencement of action; procedure. (a) A petitioner law enforcement officer may request relief under Â§ 7703 or Â§ 7704 of this title by filing an affidavit or verified petition. (b) Any petitioner may request relief under Â§ 7704 of this title by filing an affidavit or verified petition. (b) (c) A petition for a lethal violence protective order must be filed in the county where the respondent resides.